Colorado, session 2026A, HB1120.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-10-109, add (3) as
follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

39-10-109. Delinquent tax list - notice.
(3) (a) THE TREASURER SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER NOTICE OR STATEMENT
REQUIRED BY LAW IN CONNECTION WITH THE COLLECTION OF DELINQUENT
TAXES ON MOBILE HOMES, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 39-10-111.5 (1),
WRITTEN IN ENGLISH AND SPANISH, AND SHALL ALSO INCLUDE A STATEMENT
EXPLAINING HOW AND WHERE THE MOBILE HOME OWNER MAY OBTAIN
LANGUAGE TRANSLATION OR INTERPRETATION SERVICES FROM THE COUNTY.
(b) THE TREASURER SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE WRITTEN IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION BY SENDING THE
NOTICE BY MAIL AND BY PERSONAL SERVICE TO THE MOBILE HOME OWNER
AT THE MOBILE HOME, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-10-111.5 (2)(a).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-10-111.5, amend
(2)(a), (2)(c), (3), (4), (5), and (6); and repeal (2)(b) and (7) as follows:
39-10-111.5. Mobile homes - tax lien sale - redemption - public
auction.
(2) (a) Before May 31, 2024, COMMENCING ON AND AFTER JULY 1,
2026, any time after the first day of October, the treasurer may enforce
collection of delinquent taxes on mobile homes by commencing a court
action for collection or employing a collection agency as provided in section
39-10-112 or by distraining, seizing, selling, OR STRIKING OFF TO THE
COUNTY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(e) A TAX LIEN ON THE MOBILE HOME.
(b) When a mobile home upon which a distraint warrant has been
issued or which is subject to such warrant by reason of delinquency has
been removed to another county in the state, the treasurer of the county
levying the tax shall issue a certificate to the treasurer of the county to
which the mobile home has been removed, reciting the amount of taxes and
delinquent interest unpaid and a description of the mobile home to be
distrained.
(c) The treasurer receiving such certificate shall proceed to distrain,
seize, and sell OR STRIKE OFF TO THE COUNTY A TAX LIEN ON such mobile
home in ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION AND IN the same manner as if it
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1120

were originally taxed in his or her THE TREASURER'S county. and if the
treasurer proceeds, he or she THE TREASURER shall remit the net proceeds,
after payment of any sheriff's fees and other costs of seizure and THE TAX
LIEN sale, to the treasurer who certified the delinquency FOR DISTRIBUTION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(3) Whenever a mobile home is distrained and seized SUBJECT TO A
TAX LIEN SALE, the treasurer, the treasurer's deputy, or an authorized agent
of the treasurer shall deliver SEND to the owner of the mobile home, or to
his or her agent, AT THE OWNER'S LAST-KNOWN ADDRESS, OR TO THE
OCCUPANT OF THE MOBILE HOME, IF DIFFERENT FROM THE OWNER, and to
any lienholder of record, a statement of the amount demanded and notice of
the time and place fixed for the sale of the mobile home OF THE OWNER'S
DELINQUENCY AND NOTICE THAT IF THE DELINQUENCY IS NOT PAID BY THE
DATE SPECIFIED IN THE NOTICE, WHICH SHALL NOT BE LESS THAN SIXTY
CALENDAR DAYS FROM THE DATE OF MAILING OF THE NOTICE, THE
TREASURER WILL ADVERTISE AND SELL A TAX LIEN ON THE MOBILE HOME AT
A PUBLIC AUCTION OR THE COUNTY'S ANNUAL TAX LIEN SALE OR WILL STRIKE
OFF A TAX LIEN ON THE MOBILE HOME TO THE COUNTY ON THE DATE
SPECIFIED IN THE NOTICE. A STATEMENT SENT TO THE OWNER OF THE MOBILE
HOME PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3) MUST COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 39-11-102.
(4) The treasurer in his or her discretion, may, AT THEIR DISCRETION,
sell tax liens on mobile homes, or may strike off to the county the tax liens
by declaring MAKING them county-held, OR MAY DETERMINE THE TAXES TO
BE UNCOLLECTIBLE AND RECOMMEND CANCELLATION BY THE BOARD OF
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-10-114 (2)(a).
If a tax lien on a mobile home will be sold, the sale shall be in accordance
with article 11 of this title 39. THE TREASURER SHALL ISSUE A CERTIFICATE
OF PURCHASE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 39-11-117 TO THE PURCHASER OF A
TAX LIEN ON A MOBILE HOME OR TO THE COUNTY IF THE TAX LIEN ON A
MOBILE HOME IS COUNTY-HELD.
(5) Redemptions of mobile homes shall THAT ARE SUBJECT TO TAX
LIENS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION MUST be in accordance
with article 12 SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION AND ARTICLES 11.5 AND 12
of this title 39. except that, at the discretion of the treasurer, liens on mobile
homes may be withheld from sales to investors.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1120

(6) (a) (I) A mobile home that is located on leased land or other land
not owned by the owner of the mobile home, including, but not limited to,
land that was previously owned by the owner of the mobile home and the
ownership of which was subsequently acquired by foreclosure, and that is
sold or stricken off to the county under the provisions of this section may
be redeemed by the owner thereof within one year after the date of the sale
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (6)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, A MOBILE
HOME OWNER HAS THE EXCLUSIVE RIGHT TO REDEEM A MOBILE HOME THAT
IS SUBJECT TO A TAX LIEN AT ANY TIME WITHIN THREE YEARS FROM THE
DATE OF THE TAX LIEN SALE upon payment to the treasurer of the proceeds
of the sale AMOUNT OF TAXES, DELINQUENT INTEREST, FEES, AND COSTS FOR
WHICH THE TAX LIEN ON THE MOBILE HOME WAS SOLD, interest on such
amount FROM THE DATE OF THE SALE at the rate that is determined pursuant
to section 39-12-103 (3), and all taxes due and payable on the mobile home
subsequent to the tax LIEN sale. except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section AT ANY TIME WITHIN THREE YEARS FROM THE DATE OF THE TAX LIEN
SALE, A MOBILE HOME OWNER MAY REDEEM A MOBILE HOME THAT IS
SUBJECT TO THE TAX LIEN AT ANY TIME BEFORE THE EXECUTION OF A
CERTIFICATE OF OWNERSHIP PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(c) OF THIS
SECTION BY MAKING PAYMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION
(6)(a)(I). THE COUNTY MAY, IN ITS DISCRETION, REDUCE THE AMOUNT OF
COSTS REQUIRED TO BE PAID BY THE MOBILE HOME OWNER FOR THE SALE OF
A COUNTY-HELD TAX LIEN TO REDEEM THE MOBILE HOME PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (6)(a)(I).
(II) A mobile home that is located on land owned by the owner of
a mobile home and that is sold under the provisions of this section may be
redeemed by the owner thereof within three years after the date of the sale
upon payment to the treasurer of the proceeds of the sale, interest on such
amount at the rate that is determined pursuant to section 39-12-103 (3), and
all taxes due and payable on the mobile home subsequent to the tax sale,
except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
BOTH OWNS A MOBILE HOME AND IS A PERSON WITH A LEGAL DISABILITY AT
THE TIME A CERTIFICATE OF OWNERSHIP TO THE OWNER'S MOBILE HOME IS
ISSUED HAS THE RIGHT TO REDEEM THE MOBILE HOME AT ANY TIME WITHIN
NINE YEARS FROM THE DATE OF ISSUANCE OF THE CERTIFICATE OF
OWNERSHIP IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-12-104.
(b) UPON REDEMPTION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, the treasurer shall return the proceeds of the sale, interest, and all
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1120

taxes due and payable on the mobile home subsequent to the tax sale ISSUE
A CERTIFICATE OF REDEMPTION AND DISBURSE THE REDEMPTION MONEY
INCLUDING to the purchaser or lawful holder of the certificate of sale. On or
before thirty days prior to the close of the redemption period, the treasurer
shall notify the owner of the mobile home and any lienholder of record in
the department of revenue and secretary of state, by personal delivery or by
certified or registered mail to his or her last-known address, that a
treasurer's certificate of ownership for the mobile home may be issued to the
purchaser or lawful holder of the certificate of sale at the close of the
redemption period unless such payment is made. Upon redemption,
PURCHASE, IF APPLICABLE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 12 OF THIS TITLE
39. The treasurer shall notify the department of revenue that redemption has
been made and thereafter release the tax sale lien filed against the mobile
home.
(c) If the owner has not exercised his or her THE right of redemption
and after the close of the redemption period PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(6)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AT ANY TIME AT LEAST THREE YEARS FROM THE
DATE OF THE TAX LIEN SALE, the purchaser or lawful holder of the certificate
of sale PURCHASE may apply to the treasurer for a treasurer's certificate of
ownership for the mobile home. Upon receipt of such AN application, the
treasurer shall issue NOTIFY THE OWNER OF THE MOBILE HOME AND ANY
LIENHOLDER OF RECORD BY PERSONAL DELIVERY OR BY MAIL TO THE
PERSON'S LAST-KNOWN ADDRESS, THAT AN APPLICATION FOR PUBLIC
AUCTION OF A CERTIFICATE OF OPTION FOR TREASURER'S CERTIFICATE OF
OWNERSHIP HAS BEEN RECEIVED AND THAT, FOLLOWING PUBLIC AUCTION,
THE WINNING BIDDER MAY BE ISSUED A TREASURER'S CERTIFICATE OF
OWNERSHIP FOR THE MOBILE HOME, UNLESS PAYMENT IS MADE FOR
REDEMPTION. THE TREASURER SHALL CONDUCT A PUBLIC AUCTION OF a
treasurer's certificate of ownership to such purchaser or holder, and such
certificate of ownership shall transfer to him or her all right, title, and
interest in and to the mobile home OPTION FOR TREASURER'S CERTIFICATE
OF OWNERSHIP CONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS FOR PUBLIC AUCTION,
INCLUDING OVERBID, OF A CERTIFICATE OF OPTION FOR TREASURER'S DEED
IN ARTICLE 11.5 OF THIS TITLE 39. Such certificate of ownership shall, upon
application, entitle the purchaser or holder thereof to a certificate of title to
be issued and filed pursuant to part 1 of article 6 of title 42.
(d) THE TREASURER SHALL DISBURSE any surplus of the sale
proceeds over and above the taxes, delinquent interest, and costs of making
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1120

the seizure and advertising the sale of a mobile home shall be credited to the
county general fund, and a written account of the sale shall be furnished to
the owner RESULTING FROM THE PUBLIC AUCTION DEEMED OVERBID
PROCEEDS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 39-11.5-112, TO THE PERSONS ENTITLED
TO RECEIVE THEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH STATUTE.
(e) (I) (A) IF A MOBILE HOME THAT IS SUBJECT TO A TAX LIEN OR
STRICKEN OFF TO THE COUNTY PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS LOCATED ON
REAL PROPERTY THAT IS NOT OWNED BY THE OWNER OF THE MOBILE HOME,
THE UNDERLYING LANDOWNER HAS A RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL TO PAY THE
DELINQUENT TAXES OWED ON THE MOBILE HOME AND ALL STATUTORY FEES,
COSTS, AND EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE TREASURER IN CONNECTION TO THE
TAX LIEN SALE PROCESS; EXCEPT THAT AN OWNER OF A MOBILE HOME PARK,
AS DEFINED IN SECTION 38-12-201.5 (6), DOES NOT HAVE A RIGHT OF FIRST
REFUSAL AS DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (6)(e) UNLESS THE OWNER OF
THE MOBILE HOME PARK IS AN ASSOCIATION OF MOBILE HOME OWNERS.
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (6)(e), "UNDERLYING
LANDOWNER" MEANS THE OWNER OF THE REAL PROPERTY UPON WHICH THE
MOBILE HOME IS LOCATED.
(II) NO MORE THAN THIRTY CALENDAR DAYS BUT NOT LESS THAN
TEN CALENDAR DAYS PRIOR TO THE DATE OF THE TAX LIEN SALE PROVIDED
FOR IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, THE TREASURER SHALL SEND
NOTICE BY MAIL TO THE UNDERLYING LANDOWNER AT THE ADDRESS SHOWN
IN THE RECORDS OF THE COUNTY ASSESSOR OR TREASURER, INCLUDING, AT
A MINIMUM:
(A) THE AMOUNT OF DELINQUENT TAXES, FEES, COSTS, AND
EXPENSES DUE IN CONNECTION WITH THE MOBILE HOME;
(B) THE TIME, DATE, AND PLACE OF THE TAX LIEN SALE; AND
(C) THE UNDERLYING LANDOWNER'S RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL UNDER
SUBSECTION (6)(e)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(III) AN UNDERLYING LANDOWNER MAY EXERCISE THE
LANDOWNER'S RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL BY PAYING TO THE TREASURER THE
FULL AMOUNT DESCRIBED IN THE SUBSECTION (6)(e)(II)(A) OF THIS SECTION
NO LATER THAN TWO BUSINESS DAYS PRIOR TO THE DATE OF THE TAX LIEN
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1120

SALE.
(IV) IF AN UNDERLYING LANDOWNER EXERCISES THEIR RIGHT OF
FIRST REFUSAL PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(e)(III) OF THIS SECTION THE
TREASURER SHALL:
(A) CANCEL THE TAX LIEN SALE;
(B) ISSUE TO THE UNDERLYING LANDOWNER EVIDENCE OF PAYMENT
AND SATISFACTION OF THE DELINQUENT TAXES AND COSTS; AND
(C) ISSUE A CERTIFICATE OF PURCHASE TO THE UNDERLYING
LANDOWNER PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-11-117, EVIDENCING SATISFACTION
OF THE DELINQUENT TAXES AND COSTS.
(V) IF AN UNDERLYING LANDOWNER DOES NOT EXERCISE THEIR
RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL, THE TREASURER SHALL PROCEED WITH THE TAX
LIEN SALE OR COUNTY STRIKE OFF AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
(VI) THIS SUBSECTION (6)(e) DOES NOT CREATE A RIGHT OF FIRST
REFUSAL FOR ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE UNDERLYING LANDOWNER AND
DOES NOT AFFECT THE RIGHTS OF SECURED PARTIES OR LIENHOLDERS, IF
ANY, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
(f) (I) IF THE TREASURER DOES NOT ISSUE A CERTIFICATE OF
PURCHASE FOR A TAX LIEN ON A MOBILE HOME PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)
OF THIS SECTION, OR IF THE PURCHASER OR LAWFUL HOLDER OF A
CERTIFICATE OF PURCHASE OR THE OWNER OF THE MOBILE HOME IS UNABLE
TO OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF TITLE PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-6-117 DUE TO
THE LACK OF PROOF OF OWNERSHIP OR FAILURE TO SATISFY BONDING
REQUIREMENTS, THE TREASURER MAY DECLARE THE TAX LIEN STRICKEN OFF
TO THE COUNTY.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (6)(f)(IV) OF THIS SECTION,
WHEN A TAX LIEN IS STRICKEN OFF TO THE COUNTY PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (6)(f), THE MOST RECENT MOBILE HOME OWNER MAY REDEEM
THE MOBILE HOME AFTER ONE YEAR BUT NO LATER THAN THREE YEARS
FROM THE DATE OF STRIKE OFF BY PAYING THE AMOUNT OF DELINQUENT
TAXES, INTEREST, FEES, AND COSTS.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1120

(III) IF THE OWNER DOES NOT REDEEM THE MOBILE HOME WITHIN THE
THREE-YEAR REDEMPTION PERIOD AND AFTER NOTICE TO THE LAST-KNOWN
OWNER AND ANY LIENHOLDER OF RECORD IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
39-10-109 AND PROVIDING AN OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD, THE TREASURER
OR COUNTY ASSESSOR MAY DECLARE THE MOBILE HOME ABANDONED FOR
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION. UPON THIS DECLARATION, THE ASSESSOR MAY
REMOVE THE MOBILE HOME FROM THE COUNTY TAX ROLL AND THE
TREASURER MAY AUTHORIZE THE UNDERLYING LANDOWNER OR THE COUNTY
TO REMOVE AND DISPOSE OF THE MOBILE HOME IN ACCORDANCE WITH
COUNTY ABANDONED PROPERTY PROCEDURES.
(IV) (A) IF AN OCCUPANT OF A MOBILE HOME ESTABLISHES PROOF OF
OWNERSHIP, BUT THEIR OWNERSHIP IS NOT OF RECORD, THEN THE
REDEMPTION PERIOD FOR THE MOST RECENT MOBILE HOME OWNER IS THE
ONE-YEAR PERIOD PROVIDED BY LAW. IF THE MOBILE HOME HAS NOT BEEN
REDEEMED, THE TREASURER MAY ISSUE THE OCCUPANT A CERTIFICATE OF
OWNERSHIP FOR THE MOBILE HOME. THE CERTIFICATE OF OWNERSHIP
CONSTITUTES SUFFICIENT EVIDENCE OF OWNERSHIP FOR PURPOSES OF
OBTAINING A CERTIFICATE OF TITLE PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-6-117,
WITHOUT A REQUIREMENT FOR ADDITIONAL PUBLIC NOTICE OR A PUBLIC
AUCTION PROCESS. A CERTIFICATE OF OWNERSHIP ISSUED TO AN OCCUPANT
HAS THE SAME LEGAL EFFECT AS A TITLE ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION
39-11.5.-115. THE TREASURER MAY COLLECT A FEE AS AUTHORIZED BY
SECTION 42-4-510 (2)(a).
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (6)(f), "OCCUPANT" MEANS
A PERSON RESIDING IN A MOBILE HOME AS THEIR PRIMARY RESIDENCE AS
ESTABLISHED BY AT LEAST TWO DOCUMENTS, INCLUDING A CURRENT
UTILITY BILL FOR SERVICE TO THE MOBILE HOME IN THE OCCUPANT'S NAME;
A CURRENT GOVERNMENT-ISSUED IDENTIFICATION DOCUMENT LISTING THE
MOBILE HOME AS PHYSICAL ADDRESS; A CURRENT LEASE, LOT RENTAL
AGREEMENT, OR WRITTEN PERMISSION FROM THE UNDERLYING LANDOWNER;
OFFICIAL MAIL TO THE OCCUPANT AT THE MOBILE HOME ADDRESS; OR, A
SWORN AFFIDAVIT OF OCCUPANCY SIGNED UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY.
(C) A PERSON WHO FAILS TO ESTABLISH THAT THEY ARE THE
OCCUPANT OF THE MOBILE HOME IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS
OF SUBSECTION (6)(f)(IV)(B) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT ASSERT ANY RIGHT
AS AN OCCUPANT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (6)(f).
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1120

(7) Where a mobile home has been declared to be purchased by or
stricken off to the county at the tax sale and where the actual value of the
mobile home as shown on the assessment roll has been determined by the
assessor to be less than one thousand dollars, the redemption period for such
mobile home shall be sixty days. The assessor's determination of value shall
be deemed accurate absent a showing of negligence on the part of the
assessor. On or before ten days prior to the close of the redemption period,
the treasurer shall notify the owner of the mobile home and any lienholder
of record in the department of revenue and secretary of state, by personal
delivery or by certified or registered mail to the last-known address, that the
mobile home may be declared condemned and may be disposed of at the
end of the redemption period. The treasurer has the authority to so declare
a mobile home condemned after the redemption period has terminated.
After the titled mobile home is declared condemned, it may be disposed of
as the treasurer deems appropriate.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1120

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1120